Louisiana, session 2026, HB151.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 978.1 is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 978.1. Requirements for submitting motion to expunge arrest information
The following documents shall be submitted to the Bureau of Criminal
Identification and Information in addition to the motion for expungement:
(1) Criminal background check from the Louisiana State Police or a
respective sheriff's office dated within sixty days of filing.
(2) Certification letter from the district attorney verifying to his knowledge
that the applicant has no convictions or pending applicable charges within the
requisite time period of Code of Criminal Procedure Article 978 with the office of
the district attorney, and whether any charges were refused related to the arrest
incident in the motion for expungement.
(3) Court minute entries showing final disposition of the case, or in the
absence of court minutes, a charge disposition report, or a letter from the Clerk of
Court that no such records exist.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 151 ENROLLED
(4) Charging instrument, including a bill of information, indictment, or
affidavit.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.